Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-6,116
Information; use.

Information reported under section 81-6,114 may be used by the department for statistical and public health planning purposes and for other public health purposes as identified by the department in rule and regulation.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 169;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 35.